Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 29

FEDERAL
AID

Part I. Coordinator

Section

29-1 Establishment of office

29-2 Powers and duties

29-3 Appropriations

Part II. General Provisions

29-11 Definitions

29-12 Duties of attorney general, director of
finance

29-13 Governor may accept federal acts

29-14 Boards, etc., may accept funds, comply
with federal

acts

29-15 Conflict between federal and state
requirements

29-15.5 Indemnification of federal agencies

29-16 Treasury as depository; duties of
comptroller

29-17 to 23 Repealed

29-24 Repealed

29-25 Department of education; federal funds;
general

fund offset

Note

Federal funding policy study by the office of the governor;
reports to 2017-2018 legislature. L 2016, c 225.

Cross References

Hawaii performance partnerships board, see §§27-51 to 27-54.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next